Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-104 Seal. The official seal of
the commissioner shall be a vignette of King Kamehameha I, with the words
"Insurance Commissioner, State of Hawaii" surrounding the vignette.
Any certificate or license issued by the commissioner shall bear the commissioner's
official seal. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next